Utah statutes.
26-18-3.3.   Study of privatization of eligibility determination.

(1)  The department shall work with the Department of Workforce Services, the Department of Human Services, and the Privatization Policy Board created in Section 63I-4-201 to study the state's eligibility determination system for the state Medicaid program in accordance with this section.

(2) (a)  The study shall include the state's eligibility determination system for the following programs:

(i)  the state Medicaid program;

(ii)  the Utah Children's Health Insurance Program created under Chapter 40, Utah Children's Health Insurance Act;

(iii)  the Primary Care Network;

(iv)  the Utah Premium Partnership; and

(v)  other eligibility systems administered by the Department of Workforce Services.

(b)  The study shall include:

(i)  the workflow and operations of the eligibility determination systems for the programs described in Subsection (2)(a); and

(ii)  efficiencies that may be obtained through:

(A)  consolidation of the eligibility determination systems;

(B)  privatization of the eligibility determination systems; and

(C)  other technology or organizational solutions for the eligibility determination systems.

(3)  The department, the Department of Workforce Services, and the Privatization Policy Board shall, prior to October 20, 2011, report to the Legislature's Health and Human Services Interim Committee and to the Social Services Appropriations Subcommittee regarding the findings of the study and any recommendations and options regarding the advantages and disadvantages to the state in privatizing the eligibility determination system.

